Utah statutes.
58-60-202.   Definitions.
In addition to the definitions in Sections 58-1-102 and 58-60-102, as used in
this part:
(1)  "Board" means the Social Worker Licensing Board created in Section
58-60-203.
(2)  "Practice of clinical social work" includes:
(a)  the practice of mental health therapy by observation, description,
evaluation, interpretation, intervention, and treatment to effect modification
of behavior by the application of generally recognized professional social
work principles, methods, and procedures for the purpose of preventing,
treating, or eliminating mental or emotional illness or dysfunction, the
symptoms of any of these, or maladaptive behavior;
(b)  the application of generally recognized psychotherapeutic and social work
principles and practices requiring the education, training, and clinical
experience of a clinical social worker; and
(c)  supervision of the practice of a certified social worker or social
service worker as the supervision is required under this chapter and as
further defined by division rule.
(3)  "Practice of certified social work" includes:
(a)  the supervised practice of mental health therapy by a clinical social
worker by observation, description, evaluation, interpretation, intervention,
and treatment to effect modification of behavior by the application of
generally recognized professional social work principles, methods, and
procedures for the purpose of preventing, treating, or eliminating mental or
emotional illness or dysfunctions, the symptoms of any of these, or
maladaptive behavior;
(b)  the supervised or independent and unsupervised application of generally
recognized professional social work principles and practices requiring the
education, training, and experience of a certified social worker; and
(c)  supervision of the practice of a social service worker as the supervision
is required under this chapter and as further defined by division rule.
(4)  "Practice as a social service worker":
(a)  includes performance under supervision of a mental health therapist of
professional services consistent with the education and training of a social
service worker and the standards and ethics of the profession, including
patient management activities;
(b)  includes the supervised or unsupervised application of professional
social work principles and practices and the practice of case management,
which practices require only the education, training, and experience of a
social service worker and are conducted in accordance with generally accepted
standards and ethics of the profession; and
(c)  does not include engaging in the practice of mental health therapy with
an individual, family, group, or any other persons.
(5)  "Supervision of a social service worker" means supervision conducted by
an individual licensed as a mental health therapist under this title in
accordance with division rules made in collaboration with the board.
